New York, session 2025-2026, A5103.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 7.09 of the mental hygiene law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision (n) to read as follows: 3 (n) The commissioner shall, in conjunction with the commissioner of 4 the office of addiction services and supports, develop a licensing 5 program wherein facilities can be dually licensed by both the office and 6 the office of addiction services and supports. 7 § 2. Section 19.09 of the mental hygiene law is amended by adding a 8 new subdivision (m) to read as follows: 9 (m) The commissioner shall, in conjunction with the commissioner of 10 the office of mental health, develop a licensing program wherein facili- 11 ties can be dually licensed by both the office and the office of mental 12 health. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 14 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 15 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 16 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 17 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08786-02-5